Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,118
Bonds; issuance for more than one purpose.

One issue of bonds may be for any or all the purposes mentioned in sections 46-1,115 to 46-1,117.

Laws 1925, c. 128, § 5, p. 337;

C.S.1929, § 46-182;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,118.